da: Lommetype for sweatshirt: Brystlomme; Frontlomme; Håndvarmerlomme; Skjult lomme; Kængurulomme; Ingen; Sømlomme i siden; Delt kængurulomme; Lomme med lynlås; Andet
el: Τύπος τσέπης φούτερ: Τσέπη στο στήθος; Μπροστινή τσέπη-μάρσιπος; Τσέπη για ζέσταμα χεριών; Κρυφή τσέπη; Τσέπη καγκουρό; Καμία; Τσέπη σε πλαϊνή ραφή; Διαιρούμενη τσέπη καγκουρό; Τσέπη με φερμουάρ; Άλλο
nb: Lommetype for genser: Brystlomme; Frontlomme; Håndvarmerlomme; Skjult lomme; Kengurulomme; Ingen; Sidelomme; Delt kengurulomme; Glidelåslomme; Annet
bg-BG: Тип джоб на суитчър: Джоб на гърдите; Преден джоб тип торбичка; Джоб за затопляне на ръцете; Скрит джоб; Джоб тип кенгуру; Няма; Джоб в страничния шев; Разделен джоб тип кенгуру; Джоб с цип; Друго
es: Tipo de bolsillo de la sudadera: Bolsillo en el pecho; Bolsillo frontal tipo bolsa; Bolsillo calientamanos; Bolsillo oculto; Bolsillo canguro; Ninguno; Bolsillo en costura lateral; Bolsillo canguro dividido; Bolsillo con cremallera; Otro
lt-LT: Džemperio kišenių tipas: Krūtinės kišenė; Priekinė kišenė; Rankų šildymo kišenė; Paslėpta kišenė; Kengūros tipo kišenė; Nėra; Šoninės siūlės kišenė; Padalinta kengūros tipo kišenė; Kišenė su užtrauktuku; Kita
fr: Type de poche du sweat-shirt: Poche poitrine; Poche kangourou avant; Poche chauffe-mains; Poche cachée; Poche kangourou; Aucune; Poche sur la couture latérale; Poche kangourou fendue; Poche zippée; Autre
sv: Ficktyp för tröja: Bröstficka; Magficka; Handvärmarficka; Dold ficka; Känguruficka; Ingen; Ficka i sidsöm; Delad känguruficka; Blixtlåsficka; Annan
tr: Sweatshirt cep tipi: Göğüs cebi; Ön kanguru cep; El ısıtma cebi; Gizli cep; Kanguru cep; Yok; Yan dikiş cebi; Bölünmüş kanguru cep; Fermuarlı cep; Diğer
ja: スウェットシャツのポケットタイプ: チェストポケット; フロントポーチポケット; ハンドウォーマーポケット; 隠しポケット; カンガルーポケット; なし; サイドシームポケット; スプリットカンガルーポケット; ジップポケット; その他
pt-BR: Moletom tipo de bolso: Bolso no peito; Bolso frontal estilo bolsa; Bolso para aquecer as mãos; Bolso oculto; Bolso canguru; Nenhum; Bolso na costura lateral; Bolso canguru dividido; Bolso com zíper; Outro
pl: Typ kieszeni bluzy: Kieszeń na piersi; Kieszeń wsuwana z przodu; Kieszeń do ogrzewania dłoni; Ukryta kieszeń; Kieszeń typu kangurek; Brak; Kieszeń w szwie bocznym; Dzielona kieszeń typu kangurek; Kieszeń na zamek; Inny
nl: Sweatshirt zaktype: Borstzak; Buidelzak aan de voorkant; Handwarmerzak; Verborgen zak; Kangoeroezak; Geen; Zijnaadzak; Gespleten kangoeroezak; Ritszak; Overig
vi: Áo nỉ kiểu túi: Túi ngực; Túi đắp phía trước; Túi ủ ấm tay; Túi ẩn; Túi kangaroo; Không có; Túi dọc sườn; Túi kangaroo xẻ giữa; Túi có khóa kéo; Khác
hu: Melegítőfelső zsebtípusa: Mellzseb; Elülső kenguruzseb; Kézmelegítő zseb; Rejtett zseb; Kenguruzseb; Nincs; Oldalzseb; Osztott kenguruzseb; Cipzáras zseb; Egyéb
th: แบบกระเป๋าเสื้อสเวตเตอร์: กระเป๋าหน้าอก; กระเป๋าหน้าท้อง; กระเป๋าซุกมือ; กระเป๋าซ่อน; กระเป๋าจิงโจ้; ไม่มี; กระเป๋าตะเข็บข้าง; กระเป๋าจิงโจ้แบบแยก; กระเป๋าซิป; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 運動衫口袋類型: 胸前口袋; 前側大口袋; 暖手口袋; 隱藏式口袋; 袋鼠口袋; 無; 側縫線口袋; 分離式袋鼠口袋; 拉鍊口袋; 其他
cs: Typ kapsy na mikinu: Náprsní kapsa; Přední kapsa; Kapsa na zahřátí rukou; Skrytá kapsa; Klokaní kapsa; Bez kapes; Kapsa v bočním švu; Dělená klokaní kapsa; Kapsa na zip; Jiné
ru: Тип карманов толстовки: Нагрудный карман; Передний карман-мешок; Карман для рук; Скрытый карман; Карман-кенгуру; Нет; Карман в боковом шве; Раздельный карман-кенгуру; Карман на молнии; Другое
ro-RO: Tip de buzunar pentru bluză de trening: Buzunar la piept; Buzunar frontal tip marsupiu; Buzunar pentru încălzirea mâinilor; Buzunar ascuns; Buzunar marsupiu; Fără; Buzunar pe cusătura laterală; Buzunar marsupiu separat; Buzunar cu fermoar; Altele
fi: Collegepaidan taskutyyppi: Rintatasku; Etutasku; Käsienlämmittelytasku; Piilotasku; Kengurutasku; Ei mitään; Sivusaumatasku; Jaettu kengurutasku; Vetoketjutasku; Muu
sk-SK: Typ vrecka na mikine: Náprsné vrecko; Predné vrecko; Vrecko na ohriatie rúk; Skryté vrecko; Kengurie vrecko; Žiadne; Vrecko v bočnom šve; Rozdelené kengurie vrecko; Vrecko na zips; Iné
ko: 스웨트셔츠 주머니 유형: 가슴 주머니; 전면 파우치 주머니; 핸드워머 주머니; 숨겨진 주머니; 캥거루 주머니; 없음; 옆선 주머니; 스플릿 캥거루 주머니; 지퍼 주머니; 기타
zh-CN: 卫衣口袋类型: 胸袋; 前置插袋; 暖手袋; 隐形口袋; 袋鼠式口袋; 无; 侧缝口袋; 分体式袋鼠袋; 拉链口袋; 其他
en: Sweatshirt pocket type: Chest pocket; Front pouch pocket; Handwarmer pocket; Hidden pocket; Kangaroo pocket; None; Side seam pocket; Split kangaroo pocket; Zip pocket; Other
hr-HR: Tip džepa za majicu s kapuljačom: Džep na prsima; Prednji džep (tobolac); Džep za grijanje ruku; Skriveni džep; Klokan-džep; Nema; Džep u bočnom šavu; Dvodijelni klokan-džep; Džep s patentnim zatvaračem; Ostalo
de: Taschenart des Sweatshirts: Brusttasche; Vordere Beuteltasche; Handwärmertasche; Versteckte Tasche; Kängurutasche; Keine; Seitennahttasche; Geteilte Kängurutasche; Reißverschlusstasche; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta žepa na jopi: Prsni žep; Sprednji žep (pouch); Žep za gretje rok; Skriti žep; Kenguru žep; Brez; Žep v stranskem šivu; Deljeni kenguru žep; Žep z zadrgo; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de bolsos da sweatshirt: Bolso no peito; Bolso frontal tipo bolsa; Bolso para aquecer as mãos; Bolso oculto; Bolso canguru; Nenhum; Bolso na costura lateral; Bolso canguru dividido; Bolso com fecho; Outro
it: Tipo di tasca della felpa: Tasca sul petto; Tasca a marsupio anteriore; Tasca scaldamani; Tasca nascosta; Tasca a marsupio; Nessuna; Tasca nella cucitura laterale; Tasca a marsupio divisa; Tasca con zip; Altro